Alaska, session 34, HB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 05.25.055(i) is amended to read: 05 (i) The following boats are exempt from the numbering and registration 06 provisions of this section: 07 (1) a boat that 08 (A) is not a barge; 09 (B) is operated in this state for a period not exceeding 90 10 consecutive days; and 11 (C) has a current, valid certificate of number issued by another 12 state having a federally approved numbering system; 13 (2) a foreign boat operated in water of the state for a period not 14 exceeding 90 consecutive days; 01 (3) a boat owned by the United States or an entity or political 02 subdivision of the United States, or a boat owned by a state or an entity or political 03 subdivision of a state; 04 (4) a boat that is not equipped with mechanical propulsion; 05 (5) a boat with a valid document to operate the boat that is issued by a 06 foreign government; 07 (6) a handmade nonmotorized umiaq with a walrus or sealskin 08 covering; 09 (7) a commercial vessel that has a valid 10 (A) certificate of documentation issued by the United States 11 Coast Guard under 46 U.S.C. 12101 - 12121; and 12 (B) license issued under AS 16.05.490 or 16.05.530; 13 (8) a boat that 14 (A) is a barge; 15 (B) is operated in this state for a period not exceeding 60 16 consecutive days; and 17 (C) has a current, valid certificate of number issued by another 18 state having a federally approved numbering system. 19 * Sec. 2. AS 30.30.055(d) is amended to read: 20 (d) A state agency or municipality shall apply the proceeds from the sale of a 21 vessel under this chapter in the following order: 22 (1) to the administrative costs associated with impounding the vessel; 23 (2) to the costs of towing, handling, and storing the vessel; 24 (3) to the administrative costs of conducting the sale; 25 (4) to a lienholder to the extent of the lien; 26 (5) to the owner of the vessel if the owner can be found; if the owner 27 cannot be found, the balance shall be deposited into the general fund [DERELICT 28 VESSEL PREVENTION PROGRAM FUND UNDER AS 30.30.096]. 29 * Sec. 3. AS 30.30.095, 30.30.096; and AS 37.05.146(c)(79) are repealed. 30 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 31 read: 01 TRANSITION. Subject to appropriation, the balance of the derelict vessel prevention 02 program fund established under AS 30.30.096 and repealed by sec. 3 of this Act lapses into 03 the general fund. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.